California, session 20252026, AB52.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 513.5 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, to read:513.5. (a) The secretary may establish two advisory committees, which shall be known as the Black, Indigenous, and People of Color (BIPOC) Producer Advisory Committee and the Small-Scale Producer Advisory Committee, for the purpose of advising the secretary and the department with respect to their responsibilities under this article.(b) The advisory committees may advise the secretary and the department on programs, policies, education, outreach, technical assistance, and general needs for small-scale producers, medium-scale producers, and socially disadvantaged producers farmers or ranchers in California.(c) The members of the advisory committees shall be small-scale or medium-scale socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers.(d) While on official business of the advisory committees, all members of the advisory committees shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.(e) (1) The meetings of the advisory committees shall be open and public in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(2) Notice of each regular meeting of the advisory committees shall be given in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).